District of Columbia statutes.
7-751.09

Disbursement procedure.

(a)

The Department of Health shall disburse loan repayment funds to a participant in a 2-year lump sum payment for each contract entered into pursuant to § 7-751.07 within 90 days of the start of the performance under the contract.

(b)

For each year of participation beyond the original term of the contract, whether by renewal or continuation of a contract longer than 2 years, the Department of Health shall disburse to the participant a one-year lump sum payment within 90 days of the start of each additional year.

History

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-71, § 10, 53 DCR 61
Dec. 2, 2011, D.C. Law 19-47, § 2, 58 DCR 8941

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-47 rewrote the section, which formerly read:
“(a) For the 1st year of participation in the Program, the Department shall disburse loan repayment funds to a participant on a quarterly basis, with the first disbursement to occur within 45 days of the start of service obligation.
“(b) For each additional year of participation in the Program, the Department shall disburse loan repayment funds to a participant on a quarterly basis, with the 1st disbursement to occur within 45 days of the start of the next consecutive year of service.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Health Professional Recruitment Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-120, August 1, 2011, 58 DCR 6754).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Health Professional Recruitment Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-227, November 15, 2011, 58 DCR 9936).